Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
TERMS OF OFFICE

1-1-201. Commencement of terms - state, congressional district, and county officers.

The regular terms of office of all state, congressional district, and county officers shall commence on the second Tuesday of January next after their election, except as otherwise provided by law.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 636, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1397, § 10, effective July 1.

1-1-202. Commencement of terms - nonpartisan officers.

The regular terms of office of all nonpartisan officers elected at regular elections shall commence at the next meeting of the governing body following the date of the election, but no later than thirty days following the survey of returns and upon the signing of an oath and posting of a bond, where required, unless otherwise provided by law. If the election is canceled in whole or in part pursuant to section 1-5-208 (1.5), then the regular term of office of a nonpartisan officer shall commence at the next meeting of the governing body following the date of the regular election, but no later than thirty days following the date of the regular election and upon the signing of an oath and posting of a bond, where required, unless otherwise provided by law.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 636, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1397, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1151, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 1001, § 1, effective August 8.

1-1-203. End of term.

A person elected or appointed to an office shall hold office until the successor is elected, qualified, and takes office on the second Tuesday of January, unless otherwise provided by law.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 636, § 1, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1397, § 12, effective July 1.